Massachusetts, session 194th, H4361.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The definition of “Teacher” in section 1 of chapter 32 of the General Laws,
as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
Any person who served in a position described above who is vested in the teacher’s retirement
system or the Boston retirement system and is subsequently employed by the executive office of
education or the department of elementary and secondary education shall retain the status of
teacher and be considered as remaining in service in that capacity.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision (8) of section 3 of said chapter 32, as so
appearing, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:- A teacher who becomes
employed at the executive office of education or the department of elementary and secondary
education shall remain in the teacher’s retirement system or the Boston retirement system.
SECTION 3. Said subdivision (8) of said section 3 of said chapter 32, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by adding the following 2 paragraphs:-
of 3

(e) An employee of the executive office of education or the department of elementary and
secondary education who is a member of the state employees’ retirement system and who is
reinstated in the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston retirement system pursuant to
paragraph (a) shall not be deemed to have had an interruption of membership or service. Upon
reinstatement, the member shall pay into the annuity savings fund of the teachers’ retirement
system or the Boston retirement system in 1 sum, or in installments as the board may prescribe,
makeup payments equal to the difference between the contributions paid to the state employees
retirement system and the required contributions of the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston
retirement system on all regular compensation received during the period of membership in the
state employees’ retirement system.
(f) Notwithstanding the provisions of this chapter or any other general or special law to
the contrary, a member who is reinstated in the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston
retirement system pursuant to paragraph (a) shall be entered into the state employees’ retirement
system as a group 1 state employee upon retirement.
SECTION 4. (a) Notwithstanding paragraph (i) of subdivision (4) of section 5 of chapter
32 of the General Laws, an active or inactive member of the teachers’ retirement system or the
Boston retirement system who: (i) is a teacher or school nurse; (ii) became eligible for
membership in the teachers’ retirement system before July 1, 2001; (iii) began contributing to the
teachers’ retirement system before July 1, 2001; and (iv) did not provide a written election to
participate in the alternative superannuation retirement benefit program provided under said
subdivision (4) to the teachers’ retirement system or the Boston retirement system before July 1,
2001 or at any other time prior to September 1, 2025 or declined to participate in the alternative
superannuation retirement benefit program before July 1, 2001 or at any other time prior to
of 3

September 1, 2025, shall have a new 1-time opportunity to elect to participate in the alternative
superannuation retirement benefit program. A member entitled to make an election under this
section shall have 180 days from the effective date of this act to make such election.
(b) A member who participates in the alternative superannuation retirement benefit
program under this section shall make contributions at the rate of 11 per cent pursuant to section
22 of chapter 32 of the General Laws and may be required to provide make-up contributions at
the rate of 11 per cent, upon such terms and conditions as the relevant retirement system may
require, from the date that such member established membership in the teachers’ retirement
system or the Boston retirement system.
(c) The teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system shall notify eligible
active or inactive members of the teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system
and shall provide information to school districts concerning the 1-time opportunity pursuant to
subsection (a); provided, that the teachers’ retirement system and the Boston retirement system
shall provide sufficient information pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) not later than 90 days
after the effective date of this act.
of 3